Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-2] Scope. (a) This chapter
applies only to a foreign-money claim in an action or distribution proceeding.

(b) This chapter applies to foreign-money
issues notwithstanding the law applicable under the conflict of laws rules of
this State to other issues in the action or distribution proceeding. [L 1990, c
50, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next